test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_pudda_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - ákku: # ok PUDDA
    ákku+N+Sg+Nom:  ákku
    ákku+N+Sg+Gen:  ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Acc:  ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Ill:  áákun
    ákku+N+Sg+Loc:  ááhust
    ákku+N+Sg+Com:  áhhoin
    ákku+N+Sg+Abe:  áhuttáá
    ákku+N+Ess:  ákkun
    ákku+N+Par:  ákkud
    ákku+N+Pl+Nom:  ááhuh
    ákku+N+Pl+Gen: [ááhui, áhui]
    ákku+N+Pl+Acc:  ááhuid
    ákku+N+Pl+Ill:  áhhoid
    ákku+N+Pl+Loc:  ááhuin
    ákku+N+Pl+Com:  áhuiguin
    ákku+N+Pl+Abe:  áhuittáá

  Noun - puddâ:
    puddâ+N+Sg+Nom: puddâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Gen: puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Acc: puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Ill: puudân
    puddâ+N+Sg+Loc: puudâst
    puddâ+N+Sg+Com: puddáin
    puddâ+N+Sg+Abe: pudâttáá
    puddâ+N+Ess: puddân
    puddâ+N+Par: puddâd
    puddâ+N+Pl+Nom: puudah
    puddâ+N+Pl+Acc: [puudâi, pudâi]
    puddâ+N+Pl+Acc: puudâid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Ill: puddáid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Loc: puudâin
    puddâ+N+Pl+Com: pudâiguin
    puddâ+N+Pl+Abe: pudâittáá

  Noun - roppâ:
    roppâ+N+Sg+Nom: roppâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Gen: roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Acc: roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Ill: roopân
    roppâ+N+Sg+Loc: roopâst
    roppâ+N+Sg+Com: roppáin
    roppâ+N+Sg+Abe: ropâttáá
    roppâ+N+Ess: roppân
    roppâ+N+Par: roppâd
    roppâ+N+Pl+Nom: roopah
    roppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roopâi, ropâi]
    roppâ+N+Pl+Acc: roopâid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Ill: roppáid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Loc: roopâin
    roppâ+N+Pl+Com: ropâiguin
    roppâ+N+Pl+Abe: ropâittáá

  Noun - rippâ:
    rippâ+N+Sg+Nom: rippâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Gen: riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Acc: riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Ill: riipân
    rippâ+N+Sg+Loc: riipâst
    rippâ+N+Sg+Com: rippáin
    rippâ+N+Sg+Abe: ripâttáá
    rippâ+N+Ess: rippân
    rippâ+N+Par: rippâd
    rippâ+N+Pl+Nom: riipah
    rippâ+N+Pl+Gen: [riipâi, ripâi]
    rippâ+N+Pl+Acc: riipâid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Ill: rippáid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Loc: riipâin
    rippâ+N+Pl+Com: ripâiguin
    rippâ+N+Pl+Abe: ripâittáá

  Noun - lekkâ:
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Nom: lekkâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Gen: leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Acc: leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Ill: leekân
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Loc: leehâst
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Com: lehháin
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Abe: lehâttáá
    lekkâ+N+Ess: lekkân
    lekkâ+N+Par: lekkâd
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Nom: leehah
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [leehâi, lehâi]
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Acc: leehâid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Ill: lehháid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Loc: leehâin
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Com: lehâiguin
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Abe: lehâittáá

  Noun - kussâ:
    kussâ+N+Sg+Nom: kussâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuusân # lâi: kuus7ân
    kussâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuusâst
    kussâ+N+Sg+Com: kussáin
    kussâ+N+Sg+Abe: kusâttáá
    kussâ+N+Ess: kussân
    kussâ+N+Par: kussâd
    kussâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuusah
    kussâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuusâi, kusâi]
    kussâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuusâid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Ill: kussáid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuusâin
    kussâ+N+Pl+Com: kusâiguin
    kussâ+N+Pl+Abe: kusâittáá

  Noun - pakkâ:
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Nom: pakkâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Gen: paakâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Acc: paakâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Ill: paakân
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Loc: paakâst
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Com: pakkáin
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Abe: pakâttáá
    pakkâ+N+Ess: pakkân
    pakkâ+N+Par: pakkâd
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Nom: paakah
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paakâi, pakâi]
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Acc: paakâid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Ill: pakkáid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Loc: paakâin
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Com: pakâiguin
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Abe: pakâittáá

  Noun - sekkâ:
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Nom: sekkâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Gen: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Acc: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Ill: seekân
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Loc: seehâst
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Com: sehháin
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Abe: sehâttáá
    sekkâ+N+Ess: sekkân
    sekkâ+N+Par: sekkâd
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Nom: seehah
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [seehâi, sehâi]
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Acc: seehâid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Ill: sehháid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Loc: seehâin
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Com: sehâiguin
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Abe: sehâittáá

  Noun - loppâ:
    loppâ+N+Sg+Nom: loppâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Gen: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Acc: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Ill: loopân
    loppâ+N+Sg+Loc: loopâst
    loppâ+N+Sg+Com: loppáin
    loppâ+N+Sg+Abe: lopâttáá
    loppâ+N+Ess: loppân
    loppâ+N+Par: loppâd
    loppâ+N+Pl+Nom: loopah
    loppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [loopâi, lopâi]
    loppâ+N+Pl+Acc: loopâid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Ill: loppáid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Loc: loopâin
    loppâ+N+Pl+Com: lopâiguin
    loppâ+N+Pl+Abe: lopâittáá

  Noun - pennâ:
    pennâ+N+Sg+Nom: pennâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Gen: peenâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Acc: peenâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Ill: peenân
    pennâ+N+Sg+Loc: peenâst
    pennâ+N+Sg+Com: pennáin
    pennâ+N+Sg+Abe: penâttáá
    pennâ+N+Ess: pennân
    pennâ+N+Par: pennâd
    pennâ+N+Pl+Nom: peenah
    pennâ+N+Pl+Gen: [peenâi, penâi]
    pennâ+N+Pl+Acc: peenâid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Ill: pennáid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Loc: peenâin
    pennâ+N+Pl+Com: penâiguin
    pennâ+N+Pl+Abe: penâittáá

  Noun - skammâ:
    skammâ+N+Sg+Nom: skammâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Gen: skaamâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Acc: skaamâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Ill: skaamân
    skammâ+N+Sg+Loc: skaamâst
    skammâ+N+Sg+Com: skammáin
    skammâ+N+Sg+Abe: skamâttáá
    skammâ+N+Ess: skammân
    skammâ+N+Par: skammâd
    skammâ+N+Pl+Nom: skaamah
    skammâ+N+Pl+Gen: [skaamâi, skamâi]
    skammâ+N+Pl+Acc: skaamâid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Ill: skammáid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Loc: skaamâin
    skammâ+N+Pl+Com: skamâiguin
    skammâ+N+Pl+Abe: skamâittáá

  Noun - vahtâ:
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Nom: vahtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaahtân
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaavtâst
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Com: vavttáin
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Abe: vavtâttáá
    vahtâ+N+Ess: vahtân
    vahtâ+N+Par: vahtâd
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaavtah
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaavtâi, vavtâi]
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaavtâid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Ill: vavttáid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaavtâin
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Com: vavtâiguin
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Abe: vavtâittáá

  
